Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-117
Improvements on leased land, defined.

Improvements on leased land shall mean any item of real property defined in subdivisions (2) through (5) of section 77-103 which is located on land owned by a person other than the owner of the item.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 45;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 44;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB218, § 2.